Utah, session 2026, HB564.
Section 1. Section 19-2-109.8 is enacted to read:19-2-109.8. Total annual emissions limit -- Particulate matter -- Nitrogen oxides.(1)As used in this section:(a)(i)"Major nonattainment county" means a county:(A)of the first or second class, as described in Section 17-60-104; and(B)in a nonattainment area, as that term is defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7501, for ozone, PM2.5, or nitrogen oxides.(ii)"Major nonattainment county" includes:(A)Davis County;(B)Salt Lake County;(C)Utah County; and(D)Weber County.(b)"PM2.5" means airborne particulate matter approximately 2.5 micrometers or smaller in diameter.(2)The total annual emissions from point sources in major nonattainment counties may not exceed:(a)1418 tons of PM2.5 per year; and(b)8870 tons of nitrogen oxides per year.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.